Louisiana, session 2026, HB103.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.69(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§9038.69. Walnut Street Special District
* * *
B. Boundaries.(1) The district shall be comprised of the area of the city of
Monroe in the blocks of 108-128 Walnut Street in the city of Monroe to Art Alley
(2nd Street), an area of approximately one city block which shall be further defined
by an ordinance of the board of commissioners of the district.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the
district shall also be comprised of the area of the city of Monroe as follows: 210-220
Desiard Street, 233 South Grand Street, and 103/105 Wood Street.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-409 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 103